Rhode Island, session 2025, SB299.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 11 of the General Laws entitled "CRIMINAL OFFENSES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 71
CUSTODIAL LAW ENFORCEMENT SEXUAL PENETRATION
11-71-1. Definitions.
The following words and phrases, when used in this chapter, have the following meanings:
(1) “Force or coercion” shall have the same meaning as in § 11-37-1.
(2) “Peace officer” shall have the same meaning as in § 12-7-21,
(3) “Sexual penetration” shall have the same meaning as in § 11-37-1.
11-71-2. Custodial law enforcement sexual penetration prohibited.
(a) A person is guilty of custodial law enforcement sexual penetration if he or she engages
in sexual penetration with another person; and
(1) He or she is a peace officer, and the victim has been seized, is detained, has been placed
in custody, has been placed under arrest, or is confined in a correctional or law enforcement facility
or vehicle; or
(2) He or she supervises the victim’s parole, probation, or community confinement.
(b) A person convicted of a violation of this chapter shall be punished by imprisonment for
a period not to exceed three (3) years.

(c) A person convicted under this chapter shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter
37.1 of this title.
(d) It shall be an affirmative defense that the act of sexual penetration resulted from force
or coercion by the alleged victim or victims.
(e) Any sentence imposed under this chapter shall run concurrently with any other sentence
imposed for the same case.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000270
========
LC000270 - Page 2 of 3